Washington statutes.
RCW 43.31.425

Hanford area economic investment fund advisory committee.

The Hanford area economic investment fund advisory committee is hereby established to advise the director of the department of commerce.

(1) The committee shall have eleven members. The director of the department of commerce shall appoint the members, in consultation with Hanford area elected officials, subject to the following requirements:

(a) All members shall either reside or be employed within the Hanford area.

(b) The committee shall have a balanced membership representing one member each from the elected leadership of Benton county, Franklin county, the city of Richland, the city of Kennewick, the city of Pasco, a Hanford area port district, the labor community, and four members from the Hanford area business and financial community.

(c) Careful consideration shall be given to assure minority representation on the committee.

(2) Each member appointed by the director of the department of commerce shall serve a term of three years. A person appointed to fill a vacancy of a member shall be appointed in a like manner and shall serve for only the unexpired term. A member is eligible for reappointment. A member may be removed by the director of the department of commerce for cause.

(3) The director of the department of commerce shall designate a member of the committee as its chairperson. The committee may elect such other officers as it deems appropriate. Six members of the committee constitute a quorum and six affirmative votes are necessary for the transaction of business or the exercise of any power or function of the committee.

(4) The members shall serve without compensation, but are entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) Members shall not be liable to the state, to the fund, or to any other person as a result of their activities, whether ministerial or discretionary, as members except for willful dishonesty or intentional violations of law. The department may purchase liability insurance for members and may indemnify these persons against the claims of others.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 21 s 41; 1998 c 76 s 2; 1991 c 272 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 21: See note following RCW 72.23.025.

Effective dates—1991 c 272: See RCW 81.108.901.